Tennessee, session 114, HB1922.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-39-211, is amended by adding
the following new subsection:
( )
(1) While mandated to comply with the requirements of this part, a sexual
offender or violent sexual offender must notify the owner or operator of any
campground on which the offender intends to stay overnight of the offender's
status as a sexual offender or violent sexual offender prior to beginning the stay.
A person who knowingly stays overnight at a campground without providing the
notice required by this subsection ( ) commits an offense, which is punishable as
provided in subsections (f) and (g).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1922
011155
- 1 -